New Jersey, session 221, A5571.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a carrier shall not condition the payment of any benefit for a medical test or procedure, or prescription drug, upon any pre-approval or precertification of any kind by the carrier if that test, procedure or prescription drug is otherwise covered under the health benefits plan and it has been prescribed by a licensed health care provider. 2.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a third party administrator shall not condition the payment of any benefit for a medical test or procedure, or prescription drug, upon any pre-approval or precertification of any kind by the third party administrator or benefits payer if that test, procedure or prescription drug is otherwise covered under the health benefits plan and it has been prescribed by a licensed health care provider. 3.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a pharmacy benefits manager shall not condition the payment of any benefit for a prescription drug, upon any pre-approval or precertification of any kind by the pharmacy benefits manager, carrier or purchaser if that prescription drug is otherwise covered under the health benefits plan and it has been prescribed by a licensed health care provider. 4.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a contract for health benefits, or for prescription drug benefits, purchased by the State Health Benefits Program shall not condition the payment of any benefit for a medical test or procedure, or prescription drug, upon any pre-approval or precertification of any kind if that test, procedure or prescription drug is otherwise covered under the health benefits plan and it has been prescribed by a licensed health care provider. 5.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a contract for health benefits, or for prescription drug benefits, purchased by the School Employees Health Benefits Program shall not condition the payment of any benefit for a medical test, procedure or prescription drug, upon any pre-approval or precertification of any kind if that test, procedure or prescription drug is otherwise covered under the health benefits plan and it has been prescribed by a licensed health care provider. 6.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to health benefits plans or prescription drug benefits plans issued or purchased on or after that date.